Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 2. Strikes by Government Employees.

§ 40.1-55.
Employee striking terminates, and becomes temporarily ineligible for, public employment.

Any employee of the Commonwealth, or of any county, city, town or other political subdivision thereof, or of any agency of any one of them, who, in concert with two or more other such employees, for the purpose of obstructing, impeding or suspending any activity or operation of his employing agency or any other governmental agency, strikes or willfully refuses to perform the duties of his employment shall, by such action, be deemed to have terminated his employment and shall thereafter be ineligible for employment in any position or capacity during the next 12 months by the Commonwealth, or any county, city, town or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or by any department or agency of any of them.

The provisions of subsection A shall apply to any employee of any county, city, or town or local school board without regard to any local ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to §

40.1-57.2

by such county, city, or town or school board that authorizes its employees to engage in collective bargaining.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-65; 1970, c. 321; 2020, cc. 1209, 1276.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1209 and 1276, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on May 1, 2021.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1209 and 1276, effective May 1, 2021, are identical, and added subsection B and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article discussing public sector collective bargaining, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 57 (1973).

For comment, “Public Sector Collective Bargaining and Sunshine Laws — A Needless Conflict,” see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 159 (1976).

For comment on public employee collective bargaining in Virginia, see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 431 (1977).

For comment, “ ‘Working to the Contract’ in Virginia: Legal Consequences of Teachers’ Attempts to Limit Their Contractual Duties,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 449 (1982).

For a comment, “Slowing Union Corruption:
Reforming the Landrum-Griffin Act to Better Combat Union Embezzlement,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 527 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11B M.J. Labor, § 6.

§ 40.1-56.
Department head, etc., to notify employee of such termination, etc.

In any such case the head of any department of the state government, or the mayor of any city or town, or the chairman of the board of supervisors or other governing body of any county, or the head of any other such employing agency, in which such employee was employed, shall forthwith notify such employee of the fact of the termination of his employment and at the same time serve upon him in person or by registered mail a declaration of his ineligibility for reemployment as before provided. Such declaration shall state the fact upon which the asserted ineligibility is based.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-66; 1970, c. 321.

§ 40.1-57.
Appeal by employee from declaration of ineligibility.

In the event that any such employee feels aggrieved by such declaration of ineligibility he may within ninety days after the date thereof appeal to the circuit court of the county or the circuit court of the city in which he was employed by filing a petition therein for a review of the matters of law and fact involved in or pertinent to the declaration of ineligibility. A copy of the petition shall be served upon or sent by registered mail to the official signing the declaration, who may file an answer thereto within ten days after receiving the same. The court or the judge thereof in vacation shall, as promptly as practicable, hear the appeal de novo and notify the employee and the signer of the declaration of ineligibility of the time and place of hearing. The court shall hear such testimony as may be adduced by the respective parties and render judgment in accordance with the law and the evidence. Such judgment shall be final.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-67; 1970, c. 321.

§ 40.1-57.1.
Appeal by employer for reemployment of terminated employee.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the event that the employer of an individual terminated under this article deems it necessary for the protection of the public welfare that such individual be reemployed within the twelve months following his termination, the employer may, within ninety days after the date of the declaration of ineligibility, appeal to the circuit court of the county or the circuit court of the city in which the individual was employed by filing a petition therein setting forth the reasons why the public welfare requires reemployment. A copy of the petition shall be served upon or sent by registered mail to the former employee, who may file an answer therein ten days after receiving the same. The court or the judge thereof in vacation shall notify the employer and former employee of the time and place of the hearing on the appeal, such hearing to be de novo and to be held as promptly as possible. The court shall hear such testimony as may be adduced by the respective parties and render judgment in accordance with the law and the evidence. Such judgment shall be final.

History.

1972, c. 792.

Law Review.

For article discussing public sector collective bargaining, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 57 (1973).